apertium-ain.ain.lexd
! Morphological Transducer for Ainu

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>                          ! Noun
%<v%>                          ! Verb
%<adv%>                        ! Adverb
%<adj%>                        ! Adjective
%<pn%>                         ! Pronoun
%<det%>                        ! Determiner
%<cnjsub%>                     ! subordinating conjunction
%<cnjcoo%>                     ! co-ordinating conjunction
%<prt%>                        ! Particle
%<pp%>                         ! post position
%<np%>                         ! proper noun 

! Noun tags
%<abs%>                        ! Abstract qualities
%<m%>                          ! Noun male gender
%<f%>                          ! Noun female gender
%<mg%>                         ! Noun male god gender
%<mf%>                         ! Noun male or female gender
%<end%>                        ! Noun affinity tag ("=my dear x")
%<hon%>                        ! Noun honorable tag ("=my honored x")
%<px1sg%>                      ! First person singular possessive
%<px2sg%>                      ! Second person singular possessive
%<px1pl%>                      ! First person plural possessive
%<px2pl%>                      ! Second person plural possessive
%<nmlz%>                       ! Nominalization
%<rn%>                         ! relational noun
%<bn%>                         ! bound noun

! Determiner tags
%<ndet%>                       ! numeral determiner
%<ndom%>                       ! nominal demonstrative
%<adom%>                       ! anaphoric demonstrative


! Verb tags
%<pasv1%>                      ! Passive Voice chi
%<pasv2%>                      ! Passive Voice a
%<tv%>                         ! Transitive Verb
%<iv%>                         ! Intransitive Verb
%<vaux%>                       ! Auxiliary Verb
%<vx%>                         ! Verbalization
%<tvx%>                        ! Make verb transitive
%<cop%>                        ! copula
%<acaus%> 		       ! acausative
%<caus%> 		       ! causative
%<apass%>		       ! apassive
%<refl%> 		       ! reflexive


! Tense tags
%<pres%>                       ! Present Tense

! Aspect tags
%<perf%>                       ! Perfective Aspect

! Mood tags
%<pri%>                        ! Indicative Mood
%<infr%>                       ! Inferential Mood
%<comp%>		       ! Comparative Mood (should)
%<chrt%>		       ! Cohortitative Mood

! Person tags
%<p1%>                         ! First Person
%<p2%>                         ! Second Person
%<p3%>			       ! Third Person
%<p4%.                         ! Fourth Person
%<2pS%>				! Second person subject

! Clitic tags
%<cli%>                        ! Clitic
%<top%>                        ! Topic marker
%<quot%>		       ! Quotation Clitic

! Adjective tags
%<cmp%>                       ! Comparative
%<sup%>                        ! Superlative
%<adjx%>                       ! Adjectivization

! Article tags
%<def%>                        ! Definite Article

! Number morphology
%<pl%>                         ! Plural
%<sg%>                         ! Singular
%<num%>			       ! Number

! Other symbols
%>                             ! Morpheme boundary
%<dim%>                        ! Diminutive Particle
%<int%>                        ! Intensifying Particle  
%<ev%>                         ! Evidentiality
%<exc%>                        ! Exclamation
% 	                       ! Space

! Punctuation
%<sent%>                       ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>    		       ! Hyphen
%<cm%>       		       ! Comma
%<apos%>                       ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>                      ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>                      ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>                       ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>                       ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 

! Archiphonemes
%{I%}                          ! can be イ or ヒ or null

%{i%}                          ! can be i or null

%{Mm%}                         ! mu mm or null
%{Tt%}                         ! tu tt or null
%{Kk%}                         ! ku kk or null
%{t%}                          ! small tsu or null

%{w%}                          ! ウ or null (for epenthesis)
%{pe%}                         ! pe or null
%{K%}                          ! ka, ki, ku, ke, or ko

%{U%}                          ! all sorts of stuff

! Features
%[%+adjx%]                     ! adjectivalization
%[%-adjx%]                     

%[%+comp%]                     ! comparison
%[%-comp%]

%[%+sup%]                      ! superlative
%[%-sup%]  

%[%+dInd%]                     ! Indefinite determiner
%[%-dInd%]

%[%+dDef%]                     ! Definite determiner
%[%-dDef%]

%[%+tvx%]                      ! Making verb transitive
%[%-tvx%]

%[%+pl%]                       ! plurality
%[%-pl%] 

%[%+m%]                        ! male gender
%[%-m%]

%[%+f%]                        ! female gender
%[%-f%]

%[%+pasv1%]                    ! verb passification
%[%-pasv1%]

%[%+pasv2%]                    ! verb passification
%[%-pasv2%]

%[%+sg%]                       ! singular
%[%-sg%]

%[%+int%]                      ! intensifier
%[%-int%]

%[%+mg%]                       ! male (god)
%[%-mg%]

%[%+appl%]                     ! applicative
%[%-appl%]

%[%+apass%]                    ! generalized object
%[%-apass%]

%[%+refl%]                     ! reflexive
%[%-refl%]

%[%+rec%]                      ! reciprocal
%[%-rec%]

%[%+acaus%]                    ! acausative
%[%-acaus%]

%[%+pos%]                      ! possessive common noun
%[%-pos%]

%[%+pp1sg%]                    ! possessive relational noun
%[%-pp1sg%]

%[%+1ps%]                      ! 1st person possessive 
%[%-1ps%]

%[%+2p%]                       ! 2nd person
%[%-2p%]

%[%+2osg%]                       ! 2nd person sg object
%[%-2osg%]

%[%+2opl%]                       ! 2nd person pl object
%[%-2opl%]

%[%+2spl%]                       ! 2nd person pl subject
%[%-2spl%]

%[%+2ssg%]                       ! 2nd person sg subject
%[%-2ssg%]

%[%+1s%]                       ! 1st person subject
%[%-1s%]

%[%+idef%]		       ! indefinite (4th person) transitive subject
%[%-idef%]		       

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Conjunction ;
Prefix ;
Determiner ;
Auxiliary ;
PostPosition ;
Particle ;
Nominalizer ;
Exclamation ;
Punctuation ;
Pronoun ;
ProperNoun ;
Clitic ;
Adverb ;
Number ;

LEXICON Prefix

%[%-pasv1%]:チ%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-tvx%]:エ%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-sup%]:イヨッタ% %> VerbRoot ;
%[%-comp%]:ナア% %> VerbRoot ;
%[%-pasv2%]:ア%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-int%]:イ%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-1ps%]:ク%> VerbPrefix-ClassI ;
%[%-2p%]%[%-pos%]:エ%> VerbPrefix-ClassI ;
NounPrefix ;
VerbRoot ;
VerbPrefix-ClassI ;
VerbSubjectPrefix ;

LEXICON NounPrefix

%[%-dInd%]:シネ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-dDef%]:ネイ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-pl%]:ウ%> NounRoot ;
%[%-m%]:ピンネ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-f%]:マㇳネ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-mg%]:オッカイ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-sg%]:シネ%  NounRoot ;
%[%-pos%]:ク NounRoot ;
%[%-pp1sg%]:エン NounRoot ;
NounRoot ;

LEXICON VerbSubjectPrefix

%[%-2spl%]:エチ%> VerbObjectPrefix ;
%[%-2ssg%]:エ%> VerbObjectPrefix ;
%[%-1s%]:ア%> VerbObjectPrefix ;
%[%-1s%]:イ%> VerbObjectPrefix ;
%[%-idef%]:ア%> VerbObjectPrefix ;

LEXICON VerbObjectPrefix

%[%-2osg%]:エ%> VerbPrefix-ClassI ;
%[%-2opl%]:エチ%> VerbPrefix-ClassI ;
%[%-1o%]:イ%> VerbPrefix-ClassI ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassI 

! applicative
%[%-appl%]:エ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
%[%-appl%]:コ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
%[%-appl%]:オ VerbPrefix-ClassII ;
VerbPrefix-ClassII ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassII 

%[%-apass%]:イ VerbPrefix-ClassIII ;
%[%-refl%]:ヤイ VerbPrefix-ClassIII ;
%[%-rec%]:ウ VerbPrefix-ClassIII ;
%[%-acaus%]:シ VerbPrefix-ClassIII ;
VerbPrefix-ClassIII ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassIII 

%[%-appl%]:エ VerbRoot ;
%[%-appl%]:コ VerbRoot ;
%[%-appl%]:オ VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON Verb-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>:  RegVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]:  # ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]:  # ;

LEXICON Verb-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>:  RegVerbInfl ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<advz%>:%>ノ # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<tvx%>%[%+tvx%]:  # ;

LEXICON RegVerbInfl

# ;
%<v%>:%> Diminutive ;
%<int%>%[%+int%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% イ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% ヒ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]: NounInfl-Common ;
%<pasv1%>%[%+pasv1%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]: NounInfl-Common ;
%<pasv2%>%[%+pasv2%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<acaus%>%[%+acaus%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ; 
%<vaux%>%<vpres%>:シリネ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pl%>:パ VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<comp%>%[%+comp%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<sup%>%[%+sup%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%+1ps%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p2%>%<pos%>%[%+2p%]%[%+pos%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<apass%>%[%+apass%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<refl%>%[%+refl%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<sg%>%<2pS%>%[%+2spl%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<pl%>%<2pS%>%[%+2ssg%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<1pS%>%[%+1s%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<p4%>%[%+idef%]: VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;
%<appl%>%[%+appl%]:  VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;

VerbSuffix-ClassVI ;

LEXICON VerbSuffix-ClassVI 

# ;
%<caus%>:%>レ VerbPersonalSuffix ;
%<caus%>:%>テ VerbPersonalSuffix ;
VerbPersonalSuffix ;

LEXICON VerbPersonalSuffix

# ;
%<p4%>:アン # ;

LEXICON Diminutive

%<dim%>:%>ポ # ;

LEXICON NounInfl-utara
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>% ウタラ # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-U
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{U%} # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-preU

%<n%>%<pl%>%[%+pl%]: # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Nu
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ヌ # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Irreg
%<n%>%<pl%>:  # ;
NounInfl-Common ;

LEXICON NounInfl-Common

%<n%>: Diminutive ;
%<nmlz%>:%>% ㇷ゚ # ;
%<pn%>%<px1sg%>%<mf%>:%>コロ Diminutive ;
%<n%>%<vz%>:%>コロ  # ;
%<n%>%<vz%>:%>カラ  # ;
%<n%>%<det%>%<ind%>%[%+dInd%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<det%>%<def%>%[%+dDef%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%[%+sg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%[%+m%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<mg%>%[%+mg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%[%+f%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<end1%>:%>% トノケ # ;
%<n%>%<end2%>:%>% ポ # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>% ニㇱパケ # ;
%<n%>%<poss%>:%>%{w%}ェ # ;
%<n%>:  # ;
%<n%>%<cn%>%<pos%>%[%+pos%]:イヒ # ;


LEXICON NounInfl-Relational

%<n%>%<rn%>%<pos%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%+pp1sg%]:  # ;
%<n%>%<rn%>%<pos%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ア # ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adj%>%<adv%>:%>タラ # ;
!%<adj%>%<pl%>:%>パ # ;
!%<adj%>:%> AbstractNoun ;
!%<adj%>%<comp%>%[%+comp%]:  # ;
!%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+sup%]:  # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% イ # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>%<abs%>:%>% ヒ # ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<nmlz%>:%>% ㇷ゚ # ; 
!%<adj%>:  # ;

!LEXICON AbstractNoun
!%<n%>%<abs%>:ポ Diminutive ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adv%>:%>ノ # ;


LEXICON Copula

%<v%>%<cop%>:  # ;
%<v%>%<cop%>%<p4%>[%+idef%]:  # ;

!LEXICON Verb-IV
!
!%<adj%>:%>テ Verb-IV ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot
